incubator/apertium-sw-rn/apertium-sw-rn.sw.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>
%<v%>
%<sg1%>
%<pres%>
%<inf%>

%<III%>
%<VI%>

@P.PREFIX.ku@
@R.PREFIX.ku@
@D.PREFIX.ku@
@P.PREFIX.na@
@R.PREFIX.na@
@D.PREFIX.na@

LEXICON Root

NounStems ; 
V-Prefixes ; 
VerbStems ; 

LEXICON Nreg-VI

%<n%>%<VI%>: # ;

LEXICON Nreg-IX-X

%<n%>%<IX-X%>: # ;


LEXICON V-Prefixes

@P.PREFIX.ku@:@P.PREFIX.ku@ku%> VerbStems ; 
@P.PREFIX.na@:@P.PREFIX.na@na%> VerbStems ; 

LEXICON Vreg 

@D.PREFIX.na@@D.PREFIX.ku@%<v%>:@D.PREFIX.na@@D.PREFIX.ku@ # ;
@R.PREFIX.ku@%<v%>%<inf%>:@R.PREFIX.ku@ # ;

@R.PREFIX.na@%<v%>%<pres%>%<sg1%>:@R.PREFIX.na@ # ;

LEXICON NounStems 

maji Nreg-VI ; ! "water"
bia Nreg-IX-X ; ! "beer"

LEXICON VerbStems 

nywa Vreg ; ! "drink"
taka Vreg ; ! "want"
